la.dic
absum/D
adsum/D
consum/D
desum/D
insum/D
intersum/D
obsum/D
praesum/D
praetersum/D
subsum/D
supersum/D
absvm/D
adsvm/D
consvm/D
desvm/D
insvm/D
intersvm/D
obsvm/D
praesvm/D
praetersvm/D
svbsvm/D
svpersvm/D
